Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-803
Public behavioral health system; purposes.

The purposes of the public behavioral health system are to ensure:

(1) The public safety and the health and safety of persons with behavioral health disorders;

(2) Statewide access to behavioral health services, including, but not limited to, (a) adequate availability of behavioral health professionals, programs, and facilities, (b) an appropriate array of community-based services and continuum of care, and (c) integration and coordination of behavioral health services with primary health care services;

(3) High quality behavioral health services, including, but not limited to, (a) services that are research-based and consumer-focused, (b) services that emphasize beneficial treatment outcomes and recovery, with appropriate treatment planning, case management, community support, and consumer peer support, (c) appropriate regulation of behavioral health professionals, programs, and facilities, and (d) consumer involvement as a priority in all aspects of service planning and delivery; and

(4) Cost-effective behavioral health services, including, but not limited to, (a) services that are efficiently managed and supported with appropriate planning and information, (b) services that emphasize prevention, early detection, and early intervention, (c) services that are provided in the least restrictive environment consistent with the consumer's clinical diagnosis and plan of treatment, and (d) funding that is fully integrated and allocated to support the consumer and his or her plan of treatment.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 3.